finnish.large.aff
flag *W:
   V A >	N
   V A >	SSA
   V A >	STA
   V A >	LLA
   V A >	LTA
   V A >	LLE
   V A >	KSI
   V A >	NA
   V A >	-A,IN
   V A >	-A,ISSA
   V A >	-A,ISTA
   V A >	-A,ILLA
   V A >	-A,ILTA
   V A >	-A,ILLE
   V A >	-A,IKSI
   V A >	-A,INA
   V A >	A
   V A >	AN
   V A >	T
   V A >	-A,IA
   V A >	-A,IEN
   V A >	-A,IIN
   V A >	-VA,MAN
   V A >	-VA,MASSA
   V A >	-VA,MASTA
   V A >	-VA,MALLA
   V A >	-VA,MALTA
   V A >	-VA,MALLE
   V A >	-VA,MAKSI
   V A >	-VA,MANA
   V A >	-VA,MIN
   V A >	-VA,MISSA
   V A >	-VA,MISTA
   V A >	-VA,MILLA
   V A >	-VA,MILTA
   V A >	-VA,MILLE
   V A >	-VA,MIKSI
   V A >	-VA,MINA
   V A >	-VA,MA
   V A >	-VA,MAA
   V A >	-VA,MAAN
   V A >	-VA,MAT
   V A >	-VA,MIA
   V A >	-VA,MIEN
   V A >	-VA,MIIN
   V A >	-VA,MATTA
   V A >	NKIN
   V A >	NKAAN
   V A >	NKO
   V A >	NPA
   V A >	NHAN
   V A >	NKINKO
   V A >	NKAANKO
   V A >	NKOHAN
   V A >	NPAHAN
   V A >	SSAKIN
   V A >	SSAKAAN
   V A >	SSAKO
   V A >	SSAPA
   V A >	SSAHAN
   V A >	SSAKINKO
   V A >	SSAKAANKO
   V A >	SSAKOHAN
   V A >	SSAPAHAN
   V A >	STAKIN
   V A >	STAKAAN
   V A >	STAKO
   V A >	STAPA
   V A >	STAHAN
   V A >	STAKINKO
   V A >	STAKAANKO
   V A >	STAKOHAN
   V A >	STAPAHAN
   V A >	LLAKIN
   V A >	LLAKAAN
   V A >	LLAKO
   V A >	LLAPA
   V A >	LLAHAN
   V A >	LLAKINKO
   V A >	LLAKAANKO
   V A >	LLAKOHAN
   V A >	LLAPAHAN
   V A >	LTAKIN
   V A >	LTAKAAN
   V A >	LTAKO
   V A >	LTAPA
   V A >	LTAHAN
   V A >	LTAKINKO
   V A >	LTAKAANKO
   V A >	LTAKOHAN
   V A >	LTAPAHAN
   V A >	LLEKIN
   V A >	LLEKAAN
   V A >	LLEKO
   V A >	LLEPA
   V A >	LLEHAN
   V A >	LLEKINKO
   V A >	LLEKAANKO
   V A >	LLEKOHAN
   V A >	LLEPAHAN
   V A >	KSIKIN
   V A >	KSIKAAN
   V A >	KSIKO
   V A >	KSIPA
   V A >	KSIHAN
   V A >	KSIKINKO
   V A >	KSIKAANKO
   V A >	KSIKOHAN
   V A >	KSIPAHAN
   V A >	NAKIN
   V A >	NAKAAN
   V A >	NAKO
   V A >	NAPA
   V A >	NAHAN
   V A >	NAKINKO
   V A >	NAKAANKO
   V A >	NAKOHAN
   V A >	NAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,INKIN
   V A >	-A,INKAAN
   V A >	-A,INKO
   V A >	-A,INPA
   V A >	-A,INHAN
   V A >	-A,INKINKO
   V A >	-A,INKAANKO
   V A >	-A,INKOHAN
   V A >	-A,INPAHAN
   V A >	-A,ISSAKIN
   V A >	-A,ISSAKAAN
   V A >	-A,ISSAKO
   V A >	-A,ISSAPA
   V A >	-A,ISSAHAN
   V A >	-A,ISSAKINKO
   V A >	-A,ISSAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,ISSAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,ISSAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,ISTAKIN
   V A >	-A,ISTAKAAN
   V A >	-A,ISTAKO
   V A >	-A,ISTAPA
   V A >	-A,ISTAHAN
   V A >	-A,ISTAKINKO
   V A >	-A,ISTAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,ISTAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,ISTAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLAKIN
   V A >	-A,ILLAKAAN
   V A >	-A,ILLAKO
   V A >	-A,ILLAPA
   V A >	-A,ILLAHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLAKINKO
   V A >	-A,ILLAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,ILLAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,ILTAKIN
   V A >	-A,ILTAKAAN
   V A >	-A,ILTAKO
   V A >	-A,ILTAPA
   V A >	-A,ILTAHAN
   V A >	-A,ILTAKINKO
   V A >	-A,ILTAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,ILTAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,ILTAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLEKIN
   V A >	-A,ILLEKAAN
   V A >	-A,ILLEKO
   V A >	-A,ILLEPA
   V A >	-A,ILLEHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLEKINKO
   V A >	-A,ILLEKAANKO
   V A >	-A,ILLEKOHAN
   V A >	-A,ILLEPAHAN
   V A >	-A,IKSIKIN
   V A >	-A,IKSIKAAN
   V A >	-A,IKSIKO
   V A >	-A,IKSIPA
   V A >	-A,IKSIHAN
   V A >	-A,IKSIKINKO
   V A >	-A,IKSIKAANKO
   V A >	-A,IKSIKOHAN
   V A >	-A,IKSIPAHAN
   V A >	-A,INAKIN
   V A >	-A,INAKAAN
   V A >	-A,INAKO
   V A >	-A,INAPA
   V A >	-A,INAHAN
   V A >	-A,INAKINKO
   V A >	-A,INAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,INAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,INAPAHAN
   V A >	AKIN
   V A >	AKAAN
   V A >	AKO
   V A >	APA
   V A >	AHAN
   V A >	AKINKO
   V A >	AKAANKO
   V A >	AKOHAN
   V A >	APAHAN
   V A >	ANKIN
   V A >	ANKAAN
   V A >	ANKO
   V A >	ANPA
   V A >	ANHAN
   V A >	ANKINKO
   V A >	ANKAANKO
   V A >	ANKOHAN
   V A >	ANPAHAN
   V A >	TKIN
   V A >	TKAAN
   V A >	TKO
   V A >	TPA
   V A >	THAN
   V A >	TKINKO
   V A >	TKAANKO
   V A >	TKOHAN
   V A >	TPAHAN
   V A >	-A,IAKIN
   V A >	-A,IAKAAN
   V A >	-A,IAKO
   V A >	-A,IAPA
   V A >	-A,IAHAN
   V A >	-A,IAKINKO
   V A >	-A,IAKAANKO
   V A >	-A,IAKOHAN
   V A >	-A,IAPAHAN
   V A >	-A,IENKIN
   V A >	-A,IENKAAN
   V A >	-A,IENKO
   V A >	-A,IENPA
   V A >	-A,IENHAN
   V A >	-A,IENKINKO
   V A >	-A,IENKAANKO
   V A >	-A,IENKOHAN
   V A >	-A,IENPAHAN
   V A >	-A,IINKIN
   V A >	-A,IINKAAN
   V A >	-A,IINKO
   V A >	-A,IINPA
   V A >	-A,IINHAN
   V A >	-A,IINKINKO
   V A >	-A,IINKAANKO
   V A >	-A,IINKOHAN
   V A >	-A,IINPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANKIN
   V A >	-VA,MANKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MANKO
   V A >	-VA,MANPA
   V A >	-VA,MANHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MANKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MANKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKO
   V A >	-VA,MASSAPA
   V A >	-VA,MASSAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MASSAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASSAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKO
   V A >	-VA,MASTAPA
   V A >	-VA,MASTAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MASTAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MASTAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLAPA
   V A >	-VA,MALLAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKO
   V A >	-VA,MALTAPA
   V A >	-VA,MALTAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MALTAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALTAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKIN
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLEPA
   V A >	-VA,MALLEHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MALLEKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MALLEPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKIN
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKO
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIPA
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKSIPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MANAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MANAKO
   V A >	-VA,MANAPA
   V A >	-VA,MANAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MANAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MANAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MANAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINKIN
   V A >	-VA,MINKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MINKO
   V A >	-VA,MINPA
   V A >	-VA,MINHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MINKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MINKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKO
   V A >	-VA,MISSAPA
   V A >	-VA,MISSAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MISSAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISSAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKO
   V A >	-VA,MISTAPA
   V A >	-VA,MISTAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MISTAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MISTAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLAPA
   V A >	-VA,MILLAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKO
   V A >	-VA,MILTAPA
   V A >	-VA,MILTAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MILTAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILTAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKIN
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLEPA
   V A >	-VA,MILLEHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MILLEKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MILLEPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKIN
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKO
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIPA
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIKSIPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MINAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MINAKO
   V A >	-VA,MINAPA
   V A >	-VA,MINAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MINAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MINAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MINAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKO
   V A >	-VA,MAPA
   V A >	-VA,MAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MAAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MAAKO
   V A >	-VA,MAAPA
   V A >	-VA,MAAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MAAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MAAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAANKIN
   V A >	-VA,MAANKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MAANPA
   V A >	-VA,MAANHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAANKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MAANKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MAANKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MAANPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATKIN
   V A >	-VA,MATKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MATKO
   V A >	-VA,MATPA
   V A >	-VA,MATHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MATKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MATKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MIAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MIAKO
   V A >	-VA,MIAPA
   V A >	-VA,MIAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MIAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MIAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIAPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIENKIN
   V A >	-VA,MIENKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MIENKO
   V A >	-VA,MIENPA
   V A >	-VA,MIENHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIENKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MIENKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MIENKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIENPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIINKIN
   V A >	-VA,MIINKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MIINKO
   V A >	-VA,MIINPA
   V A >	-VA,MIINHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIINKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MIINKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MIINKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MIINPAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKIN
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKAAN
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKO
   V A >	-VA,MATTAPA
   V A >	-VA,MATTAHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKINKO
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKAANKO
   V A >	-VA,MATTAKOHAN
   V A >	-VA,MATTAPAHAN
   V A >	SSANIKIN
   V A >	SSANIKAAN
   V A >	SSANIKO
   V A >	SSANIPA
   V A >	SSANIHAN
   V A >	SSANIKINKO
   V A >	SSANIKAANKO
   V A >	SSANIKOHAN
   V A >	SSANIPAHAN
   V A >	SSASIKIN
   V A >	SSASIKAAN
   V A >	SSASIKO
   V A >	SSASIPA
   V A >	SSASIHAN
   V A >	SSASIKINKO
   V A >	SSASIKAANKO
   V A >	SSASIKOHAN
   V A >	SSASIPAHAN
   V A >	SSANSAKIN
   V A >	SSANSAKAAN
   V A >	SSANSAKO
   V A >	SSANSAPA
   V A >	SSANSAHAN
   V A >	SSANSAKINKO
   V A >	SSANSAKAANKO
   V A >	SSANSAKOHAN
   V A >	SSANSAPAHAN
   V A >	SSAMMEKIN
   V A >	SSAMMEKAAN
   V A >	SSAMMEKO
   V A >	SSAMMEPA
   V A >	SSAMMEHAN
   V A >	SSAMMEKINKO
   V A >	SSAMMEKAANKO
   V A >	SSAMMEKOHAN
   V A >	SSAMMEPAHAN
   V A >	SSANNEKIN
   V A >	SSANNEKAAN
   V A >	SSANNEKO
   V A >	SSANNEPA
   V A >	SSANNEHAN
   V A >	SSANNEKINKO
   V A >	SSANNEKAANKO
   V A >	SSANNEKOHAN
   V A >	SSANNEPAHAN
   V A >	STANIKIN
   V A >	STANIKAAN
   V A >	STANIKO
   V A >	STANIPA
   V A >	STANIHAN
   V A >	STANIKINKO
   V A >	STANIKAANKO
   V A >	STANIKOHAN
   V A >	STANIPAHAN
   V A >	STASIKIN
   V A >	STASIKAAN
   V A >	STASIKO
   V A >	STASIPA
   V A >	STASIHAN
   V A >	STASIKINKO
   V A >	STASIKAANKO
   V A >	STASIKOHAN
   V A >	STASIPAHAN
   V A >	STANSAKIN
   V A >	STANSAKAAN
   V A >	STANSAKO
   V A >	STANSAPA
   V A >	STANSAHAN
   V A >	STANSAKINKO
   V A >	STANSAKAANKO
   V A >	STANSAKOHAN
   V A >	STANSAPAHAN
   V A >	STAMMEKIN
   V A >	STAMMEKAAN
   V A >	STAMMEKO
   V A >	STAMMEPA
   V A >	STAMMEHAN
   V A >	STAMMEKINKO
   V A >	STAMMEKAANKO
   V A >	STAMMEKOHAN
   V A >	STAMMEPAHAN
   V A >	STANNEKIN
   V A >	STANNEKAAN
   V A >	STANNEKO
   V A >	STANNEPA
   V A >	STANNEHAN
   V A >	STANNEKINKO
   V A >	STANNEKAANKO
   V A >	STANNEKOHAN
   V A >	STANNEPAHAN
   V A >	LLANIKIN
   V A >	LLANIKAAN
   V A >	LLANIKO
   V A >	LLANIPA
   V A >	LLANIHAN
   V A >	LLANIKINKO
   V A >	LLANIKAANKO
   V A >	LLANIKOHAN
   V A >	LLANIPAHAN
   V A >	LLASIKIN
   V A >	LLASIKAAN
   V A >	LLASIKO
   V A >	LLASIPA
   V A >	LLASIHAN
   V A >	LLASIKINKO
   V A >	LLASIKAANKO
   V A >	LLASIKOHAN
   V A >	LLASIPAHAN
   V A >	LLANSAKIN
   V A >	LLANSAKAAN
   V A >	LLANSAKO
   V A >	LLANSAPA
   V A >	LLANSAHAN
   V A >	LLANSAKINKO
   V A >	LLANSAKAANKO
   V A >	LLANSAKOHAN
   V A >	LLANSAPAHAN
   V A >	LLAMMEKIN
   V A >	LLAMMEKAAN
   V A >	LLAMMEKO
   V A >	LLAMMEPA
   V A >	LLAMMEHAN
   V A >	LLAMMEKINKO
   V A >	LLAMMEKAANKO
   V A >	LLAMMEKOHAN
   V A >	LLAMMEPAHAN
   V A >	LLANNEKIN
   V A >	LLANNEKAAN
   V A >	LLANNEKO
   V A >	LLANNEPA
   V A >	LLANNEHAN
   V A >	LLANNEKINKO
   V A >	LLANNEKAANKO
   V A >	LLANNEKOHAN
   V A >	LLANNEPAHAN
   V A >	LTANIKIN
   V A >	LTANIKAAN
   V A >	LTANIKO
   V A >	LTANIPA
   V A >	LTANIHAN
   V A >	LTANIKINKO
   V A >	LTANIKAANKO
   V A >	LTANIKOHAN
   V A >	LTANIPAHAN
   V A >	LTASIKIN
   V A >	LTASIKAAN
